Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5848.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-16 of the General Laws entitled "Community Health Centers" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-16-5. Community based health care investment.
(a) The department of health in consultation with the executive office of health and human
services, shall collaborate with community health centers, to establish new programs designed to
attract additional federal funds, with a focus on available Medicaid assistance and Teaching Health
Center Graduate Medical Education programs.
(b) The residency selection process at any community health center for any doctor, shall
include as a consideration, the likelihood of the doctor remaining employed at that community
health center upon the completion of the doctor's residency.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001523
========